Illinois, session 104th, HB3079.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Contract Fraud Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 545/2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.52)7    Sec. 2. Spending money without obtaining title to land; 8approval of title by Attorney General. 9    (a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 2 of the 10Superconducting Super Collider Act or for projects constructed 11under the Bikeway Act, any person or persons, commissioner or 12commissioners, or other officer or officers, entrusted with 13the construction or repair of any public work or improvement, 14as set forth in Section 1, who shall expend or cause to be 15expended upon such public work or improvement, the whole or 16any part of the moneys appropriated therefor, or who shall 17commence work, or in any way authorize work to be commenced, 18thereon, without first having obtained a title, by purchase, 19donation, condemnation or otherwise, to all lands needed for 20such public work or improvement, running to the People of the 21State of Illinois; such title to be approved by the Attorney 22General, and his approval certified by the Secretary of State 23and placed on record in his office, shall be deemed guilty of a   HB3079- 2 -LRB104 11111 HLH 21193 b1Class A misdemeanor.2    (b) Approval of title by the Attorney General for all 3lands needed for a public work or improvement shall not be 4required as established under subsection (a) of this Section 5and the State Comptroller may draw warrant in payment of 6consideration for all such lands without requiring approval of 7title by the Attorney General if consideration to be paid does 8not exceed $25,000 and the title acquired for such lands is 9for:10        (1) a fee simple title or easement acquired by the 11    State for highway right-of-way; or12        (2) an acquisition of rights or easements of access, 13    crossing, light, air or view to, from or over a freeway 14    vested in abutting property; or 15        (3) a fee simple title or easement used to place 16    utility lines and connect a permanent public work or 17    improvement owned by the State to main utility lines; or18        (4) for the purpose of flood relief or other water 19    resource projects.20    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of State or 21federal law, if the Attorney General fails to approve or 22disapprove the title within 45 days of submittal, the title 23shall be deemed approved by the Attorney General. 24    (c) This Section does not apply to any otherwise lawful 25expenditures for the construction, completion, remodeling, 26maintenance and equipment of buildings and other facilities   HB3079- 3 -LRB104 11111 HLH 21193 b1made in connection with and upon premises owned by the 2Illinois Building Authority, nor shall this Section apply to 3improvements to real estate leased by any State agency as 4defined in the Illinois State Auditing Act, provided the 5leasehold improvements were contracted for by an agency with 6leasing authority and in compliance with the rules and 7regulations promulgated by such agency for that purpose.8(Source: P.A. 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.)